Yamls-norm/V-hiqmata_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - hĩmata: # Verb pg 2016: 86 'eng copulate, pt copular' - partial paradigm
# Perfect aspect
     hĩmata+V+ScSg1: nhĩĩmata # I see
     hĩmata+V+ScSg2: pĩĩmata # you(sg) see
     hĩmata+V+ScSg3+Msc: ĩĩmata # he sees
     hĩmata+V+ScSg3+Fem: ũĩmata # she sees
     hĩmata+V+ScPl1: ãĩmata # we see
     hĩmata+V+ScPl2: hĩĩmata # you(pl) see
     hĩmata+V+ScPl3+Mal: ĩĩmatana # they see
     hĩmata+V+ScPl3+Fem: ũĩmatana # they see

     hĩmata+V+ScSg1+Oc3M: nhĩĩmatary # I see it(Mal)
     hĩmata+V+ScSg1+Oc3F: nhĩĩmataru # I see it(Fem)
     hĩmata+V+ScSg1+OcSg2: nhĩĩmatai # I see you
     hĩmata+V+ScSg1+OcPl2: nhĩĩmatai # I see you


     hĩmata+V+ScPl1+Oc3M: ãĩmatary # we see it
     hĩmata+V+ScPl1+Oc3F: ãĩmataru # we see it
     hĩmata+V+ScPl1+OcSg2: ãĩmatai # we see you
     hĩmata+V+ScPl1+OcPl2: ãĩmatai # we see you

     hĩmata+V+ScSg2+Oc3M: pĩĩmatary # you(Sg) see it(Mal)
     hĩmata+V+ScSg2+Oc3F: pĩĩmataru # you(Sg) see it(Fem)
     hĩmata+V+ScSg2+OcSg1: pĩĩmatano # you(Sg) see me
     hĩmata+V+ScSg2+OcPl1: pĩĩmatawa # you(Sg) see us

     hĩmata+V+ScPl2+Oc3M: hĩĩmatary # you see it
     hĩmata+V+ScPl2+Oc3F: hĩĩmataru # you see it
     hĩmata+V+ScPl2+OcSg1: hĩĩmatano # you see me
     hĩmata+V+ScPl2+OcPl1: hĩĩmatawa # you see us

     hĩmata+V+ScSg3+Mal+Oc3M: ĩĩmatary # he(Sg) see it(Mal)
     hĩmata+V+ScSg3+Mal+Oc3F: ĩĩmataru # he(Sg) see it(Mal)
     hĩmata+V+ScSg3+Fem+Oc3M: ũĩmatary # she(Sg) see it(Fem)
     hĩmata+V+ScSg3+Fem+Oc3F: ũĩmataru # she(Sg) see it(Fem)
     hĩmata+V+ScSg3+Mal+OcSg1: ĩĩmatano # he(Sg) see me
     hĩmata+V+ScSg3+Mal+OcPl1: ĩĩmatawa # he(Sg) see us
     hĩmata+V+ScSg3+Fem+OcSg1: ũĩmatano # she(Sg) see me
     hĩmata+V+ScSg3+Fem+OcPl1: ũĩmatawa # she(Sg) see us
     hĩmata+V+ScSg3+Mal+OcSg2: ĩĩmatai # he(Sg) see you(sg)
     hĩmata+V+ScSg3+Mal+OcPl2: ĩĩmatai # he(Sg) see you(pl)
     hĩmata+V+ScSg3+Fem+OcSg2: ũĩmatai # she(Sg) see you(sg)
     hĩmata+V+ScSg3+Fem+OcPl2: ũĩmatai # she(Sg) see you(pl)


     hĩmata+V+ScPl3+Msc+Oc3M: ĩĩmatanary # they see him
     hĩmata+V+ScPl3+Msc+Oc3F: ĩĩmatanaru # they see her
     hĩmata+V+ScPl3+Msc+OcSg1: ĩĩmatanano # they see me
     hĩmata+V+ScPl3+Msc+OcPl1: ĩĩmatanawa # they see us
     hĩmata+V+ScPl3+Msc+OcSg2: ĩĩmatanai # they see you(sg)
     hĩmata+V+ScPl3+Msc+OcPl2: ĩĩmatanai # they see you(pl)

     hĩmata+V+ScPl3+Fem+Oc3M: ũĩmatanary # they see him
     hĩmata+V+ScPl3+Fem+Oc3F: ũĩmatanaru # they see her
     hĩmata+V+ScPl3+Fem+OcSg1: ũĩmatanano # they see me
     hĩmata+V+ScPl3+Fem+OcPl1: ũĩmatanawa # they see us
     hĩmata+V+ScPl3+Fem+OcSg2: ũĩmatanai # they see you(sg)
     hĩmata+V+ScPl3+Fem+OcPl2: ũĩmatanai # they see you(pl)
